Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.0139

Resident tuition rates—Border county higher education opportunity project.

For the purposes of determining resident tuition rates, "resident student" includes a resident of Oregon, residing in Columbia, Gilliam, Hood River, Multnomah, Clatsop, Clackamas, Morrow, Sherman, Umatilla, Union, Wallowa, Wasco, or Washington county, who meets the following conditions:

(1) The student is eligible to pay resident tuition rates under Oregon laws and has been domiciled in Columbia, Gilliam, Hood River, Multnomah, Clatsop, Clackamas, Morrow, Sherman, Umatilla, Union, Wallowa, Wasco, or Washington county for at least ninety days immediately before enrollment at a community college located in Asotin, Benton, Clark, Columbia, Cowlitz, Franklin, Garfield, Klickitat, Pacific, Skamania, Wahkiakum, or Walla Walla county, Washington;

(2) The student is enrolled in courses located at the Tri-Cities or Vancouver campus of Washington State University for eight credits or less; or

(3) The student is currently domiciled in Washington and:

(a) Was eligible to pay resident tuition rates under Oregon laws; and

(b) Had been domiciled in Columbia, Gilliam, Hood River, Multnomah, Clatsop, Clackamas, Morrow, Sherman, Umatilla, Union, Wallowa, Wasco, or Washington county for at least ninety days immediately before being domiciled in Washington.

[ 2017 c 52 s 2; 2009 c 158 s 2; 2003 c 159 s 4; 2002 c 130 s 3; 2000 c 160 s 2; 1999 c 320 s 4.]